de: Kompatible Kühlmittelchemie: Formeln für asiatische Fahrzeuge; Dex-Cool-kompatibel; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Additive Technology); OAT (Organic Acid Technology); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universal/Alle Kühlmittelarten; Sonstige
en: Compatible coolant chemistry: Asian vehicle formulas; Dex-Cool compatible; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Additive Technology); OAT (Organic Acid Technology); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universal/all coolant types; Other
ro-RO: Compoziție chimică agent de răcire compatibilă: Formule pentru vehicule asiatice; Compatibil cu Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Tehnologie cu acizi organici hibrizi); IAT (Tehnologie cu aditivi anorganici); OAT (Tehnologie cu acizi organici); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universal/toate tipurile de antigel; Altele
tr: Uyumlu soğutma sıvısı kimyası: Asya araç formülleri; Dex-Cool uyumlu; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hibrit Organik Asit Teknolojisi); IAT (İnorganik Katkı Teknolojisi); OAT (Organik Asit Teknolojisi); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Evrensel/tüm soğutma sıvıları; Diğer
pt-PT: Química do líquido de refrigeração compatível: Fórmulas para veículos asiáticos; Compatível com Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Tecnologia Híbrida de Ácidos Orgânicos); IAT (Tecnologia de Aditivos Inorgânicos); OAT (Tecnologia de Ácidos Orgânicos); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universal/todos os tipos de líquido de refrigeração; Outra
it: Composizione chimica del liquido di raffreddamento compatibile: Formule per veicoli asiatici; Compatibile con Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (tecnologia ibrida ad acidi organici); IAT (tecnologia con additivi inorganici); OAT (tecnologia ad acidi organici); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universale/tutti i tipi di refrigerante; Altra
da: Kompatibel kølemiddelkemi: Formler til asiatiske køretøjer; Dex-Cool-kompatibel; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Additive Technology); OAT (Organic Acid Technology); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universal/alle kølevæsketyper; Andet
th: สารเคมีของน้ำยาหล่อเย็นที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: สูตรสำหรับรถยนต์เอเชีย; รองรับ Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (เทคโนโลยีไฮบริดออร์แกนิกแอซิด); IAT (เทคโนโลยีสารเติมแต่งอนินทรีย์); OAT (เทคโนโลยีออร์แกนิกแอซิด); P-OAT; Si-OAT; อเนกประสงค์/น้ำยาหล่อเย็นทุกประเภท; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilna kemija rashladne tekućine: Formule za azijska vozila; Kompatibilno sa sustavom Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (hibridna tehnologija organskih kiselina); IAT (tehnologija anorganskih aditiva); OAT (tehnologija organskih kiselina); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Univerzalno / sve vrste rashladne tekućine; Ostalo
ja: 互換性のある冷却液の化学組成: アジア車用; Dex-Cool互換; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (ハイブリッド有機酸技術); IAT (無機添加剤技術); OAT (有機酸技術); P-OAT; Si-OAT; 汎用 / すべてのクーラントタイプ; その他
fi: Yhteensopiva jäähdytysnesteen kemia: Aasialaisten ajoneuvojen koostumukset; Dex-Cool-yhteensopiva; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Additive Technology); OAT (Organic Acid Technology); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Yleiskäyttöinen / kaikki jäähdytysnestetyypit; Muu
nb: Kompatibel kjølevæskekjemi: Formler for asiatiske kjøretøy; Kompatibel med Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Additive Technology); OAT (Organic Acid Technology); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universell / alle kjølevæsketyper; Annet
es: Química del refrigerante compatible: Fórmulas para vehículos asiáticos; Compatible con Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (tecnología de ácido orgánico híbrido); IAT (tecnología de ácido inorgánico); OAT (tecnología de ácido orgánico); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universal/todos los tipos de refrigerantes; Otro
zh-TW: 相容的冷卻液化學類型: 亞洲車款配方; 相容於 Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (混合有機酸技術); IAT (無機添加劑技術); OAT (有機酸技術); P-OAT; Si-OAT; 通用/所有冷卻液類型; 其他
sk-SK: Zloženie kompatibilnej chladiacej kvapaliny: Zloženia pre ázijské vozidlá; Kompatibilné s Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (hybridná technológia organických kyselín); IAT (technológia anorganických aditív); OAT (technológia organických kyselín); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Univerzálne/všetky typy chladiacich kvapalín; Iné
pt-BR: Química do líquido de arrefecimento compatível: Fórmulas de veículos asiáticos; Compatível com Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Tecnologia de Ácido Orgânico Híbrido); IAT (Tecnologia de Aditivo Inorgânico); OAT (Tecnologia de Ácido Orgânico); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universal/todos os tipos de líquido de arrefecimento; Outro
sl-SI: Združljiva kemija hladilne tekočine: Formule za azijska vozila; Združljivo z Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (hibridna tehnologija organskih kislin); IAT (tehnologija anorganskih aditivov); OAT (tehnologija organskih kislin); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Univerzalno/vse vrste hladilnih tekočin; Drugo
ko: 호환 가능한 냉각수 화학 성분: 아시아 차량용 포뮬러; Dex-Cool 호환; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT(하이브리드 유기산 기술); IAT(무기 첨가제 기술); OAT(유기산 기술); P-OAT; Si-OAT; 범용/모든 냉각수 유형; 기타
ru: Совместимая химия охлаждающей жидкости: Составы для азиатских автомобилей; Совместимо с Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (гибридная технология органических кислот); IAT (технология неорганических присадок); OAT (технология органических кислот); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Универсальный/все типы антифризов; Другое
cs: Kompatibilní chemické složení chladicí kapaliny: Složení pro asijská vozidla; Kompatibilní s Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Additive Technology); OAT (Organic Acid Technology); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Univerzální / všechny typy chladicích kapalin; Jiné
pl: Kompatybilna chemia płynu chłodniczego: Formuły dla pojazdów azjatyckich; Kompatybilny z Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (hybrydowa technologia kwasów organicznych); IAT (technologia dodatków nieorganicznych); OAT (technologia kwasów organicznych); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Uniwersalny/wszystkie typy płynów chłodzących; Inne
bg-BG: Съвместима химия на охлаждащата течност: Формули за азиатски автомобили; Съвместим с Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Additive Technology); OAT (Organic Acid Technology); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Универсална/всички видове антифриз; Друго
hu: Kémiailag kompatibilis hűtőfolyadék: Ázsiai jármű formulák; Dex-Cool kompatibilis; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (hibrid szerves savas technológia); IAT (szervetlen adalékos technológia); OAT (szerves savas technológia); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Univerzális / minden hűtőfolyadék-típus; Egyéb
el: Συμβατή χημεία ψυκτικού μέσου με συμβατό ψυκτικό μέσο: Συνθέσεις για ασιατικά οχήματα; Συμβατό με Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Υβριδική τεχνολογία οργανικών οξέων); IAT (Τεχνολογία ανόργανων προσθέτων); OAT (Τεχνολογία οργανικών οξέων); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Γενικής χρήσης/όλοι οι τύποι ψυκτικού; Άλλο
fr: Composition chimique compatible du liquide de refroidissement: Formules pour véhicules asiatiques; Compatible avec Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Technologie hybride d’acides organiques); IAT (Technologie d’additifs inorganiques); OAT (Technologie d’acides organiques); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universel / tous types de liquide de refroidissement; Autre
zh-CN: 适配的冷却液化学成分: 亚洲车型配方; 兼容 Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT（混合有机酸技术）; IAT（无机添加剂技术）; OAT（有机酸技术）; P-OAT; Si-OAT; 通用/所有防冻液类型; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinama aušinimo skysčio cheminė sudėtis: Azijietiškų transporto priemonių formulės; Suderinama su „Dex-Cool“; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (hibridinė organinių rūgščių technologija); IAT (neorganinių priedų technologija); OAT (organinių rūgščių technologija); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universalus / visų tipų aušinimo skysčiams; Kita
sv: Kompatibel kylvätskekemi: För asiatiska fordon; Kompatibel med Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Additive Technology); OAT (Organic Acid Technology); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universell/alla typer av kylarvätskor; Annat
nl: Compatibele koelvloeistofchemie: Formules voor Aziatische voertuigen; Compatibel met Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Additive Technology); OAT (Organic Acid Technology); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Universeel/alle koelvloeistoftypen; Overig
vi: Thành phần hóa học chất làm mát tương thích: Công thức dành cho xe Châu Á; Tương thích Dex-Cool; G11; G12++; G12/G12+; G13; HOAT (Công nghệ axit hữu cơ lai); IAT (Công nghệ phụ gia vô cơ); OAT (Công nghệ axit hữu cơ); P-OAT; Si-OAT; Đa năng/tất cả loại nước làm mát; Khác